California statutes. Education Code
(2) Each of the reports in paragraph (1) shall include recommendations on any statutory or regulatory changes necessary to improve the ability of community colleges to implement their locally developed guided pathways programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 23, Sec. 14.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 54.82. Community Colleges Student Success Completion Grant [88930. - 88933.]

88930.

For purposes of this part, “academic year” means the total of two consecutive semesters or three quarters, commencing with the opening of the fall term. Each semester or quarter is approximately the same length.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 50.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

88931.

(a) Commencing with the 2018–19 academic year, each participating community college shall provide a grant award to a student pursuant to subdivision (b). The purpose of the grant award is to provide the student with additional financial aid to help offset the student’s total cost of community college attendance.

(b) A student attending a community college may receive a grant award pursuant to this section if the student meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The student receives a Cal Grant B or C award pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5.

(2) The student is making satisfactory academic
 progress at the community college under criteria required by the applicable federal standards published in Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The criteria applied by the community college for determining satisfactory academic progress shall, to the extent consistent with applicable federal standards, provide that homelessness, as defined as a “homeless individual” within the meaning of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11302(a)), or as defined as a “homeless child or youth,” as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), is an extenuating circumstance for students who are otherwise unable to meet the requirements deemed to constitute “satisfactory academic progress” at that community college. The community college may consider this extenuating circumstance, in its discretion, to the extent consistent with federal standards, to alter or excuse compliance with those progress
 requirements.

(3) The student is a California resident or is exempt from paying nonresident tuition under Section 68130.5 or 76140.

(c) (1) The students who meet the applicant criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be eligible for the following grant amounts:

(A) One thousand two hundred ninety-eight dollars ($1,298) per semester, or quarterly equivalent, for eligible students who enroll in 12, 13, or 14 units per semester, or the quarterly equivalent number of units.

(B) Four thousand dollars ($4,000) per semester, or quarterly equivalent, for eligible students who enroll in 15 units per semester, or the quarterly equivalent number of units.

(2) Notwithstanding
 paragraph (1), commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, the students meeting the applicant criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) who are current or former foster youth, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 69433.6, shall be eligible for a grant amount of five thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($5,250) per semester, or quarterly equivalent, if they enroll in 12 or more units per semester, or the quarterly equivalent number of units.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), commencing with the 2025–26 academic year, the students meeting the applicant criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) who enroll in nine or more units per semester, or the quarterly equivalent number of units, and are considered full time as part of a disabled student programs and services Academic Accommodation Plan, as described in Section 56022 of Title 5 of the California Code
 of Regulations, shall be eligible for a grant amount of one thousand two hundred ninety-eight dollars ($1,298) per semester, or the quarterly equivalent.

(4) (A) If funding is available after making awards to students in the primary terms, a community college may grant additional awards to students who take a sufficient number of units during the summer term to bring their total number of academic units to 24 units or more for the academic year. The chancellor’s office shall work with colleges to determine the summer grant amounts based on available funds.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that the available grants would be prorated to allocate a larger amount to students who take a sufficient number of units for a total of 30 units or more for the academic year.

(d) (1) To the extent practicable, a grant award shall be awarded at the same time as a recipient’s overall financial aid package.

(2) The grant award shall be considered a supplemental grant, and shall not supplant any other grant, fee waiver, or scholarship aid received by the student, including, but not necessarily limited to, federal grants, Cal Grant awards, institutional grants, merit-based scholarships, and athletic scholarships.

(3) The grant award shall be based upon the financial need of the applicant, and shall not exceed the calculated financial need for any
 individual applicant. The minimum level of financial need of applicants shall be determined by the commission pursuant to Section 69432.9.

(4) The grant award identified in subdivision (c) shall be proportionally reduced if the amount of funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose is insufficient to fully fund the total number of students awarded a grant.

(e) (1) Each participating community college shall administer the grant award pursuant to the requirements of this section.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that a student is enrolled in a program of study and has completed an education plan identifying courses, a sequence of courses, key progress of milestones, and other requirements the student must complete to earn an associate degree, career technical education
 certificate, other community college certificate, or meet transfer requirements.

(3) Each participating community college shall encourage students to enroll in a sufficient number of units per semester, quarter, or summer term to be considered on track to obtain a certificate, associate degree for transfer, or associate degree or transfer to a four-year university within two academic years or within three academic years if a student is required to take basic skill courses by the community college.

(f) This section shall not be operative in a fiscal year unless funding has been provided for this section for that fiscal year in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 685, Sec. 1.   (AB 1885)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

88932.

(a) On or before April 1, 2020, the chancellor shall report to the Legislature all of the following for the 2018–19 award year:

(1) The number of grant award recipients who met the requirements of Section 88931, disaggregated by recipients who are pursuing an associate degree for transfer, an associate degree, or a career technical education certificate, or other community college certificate, and further disaggregated by the type of certificate.

(2) The number of grant award recipients who met the requirements of Section 88931 and received a grant disaggregated by the number of units the recipients were enrolled in each term during the academic year.

(3) The number of grant award recipients who met the requirements of Section 88931 considered on track to complete their educational program within two academic years, within three academic years if a student is required to take basic skill courses by the community college, within the published length of time, or within the published length of time plus one year if a student is required to take basic skill courses by the community college.

(4) The average grade point average of grant award recipients.

(b) Student information reported pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, and socioeconomic status.

(c) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is
 inoperative on April 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 50.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

88933.

The board of governors may adopt regulations to administer this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 50.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 8. CALIFORNIA STATE UNIVERSITY [89000. - 90520.]



  PART 55. CALIFORNIA STATE UNIVERSITY [89000. - 90520.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [89000. - 89090.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [89000. - 89011.]

89000.

As used in this division, “trustees” means the Trustees of the California State University, created under Section 66600.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 638, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

89001.

(a) The California State University includes the institutions for higher education whose locations or designations are listed in this section.

(1) San Jose.

(2) San Francisco.

(3) Chico.

(4) Humboldt.

(5) San Diego.

(6) Fresno.

(7) California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo.

(8) California State Polytechnic University, Pomona.

(9) Long Beach.

(10) Los Angeles.

(11) Sacramento.

(12) Hayward.

(13) San Fernando Valley.

(14) Fullerton.

(15) Stanislaus.

(16) Sonoma.

(17) San Bernardino.

(18) Dominguez Hills.

(19) Contra Costa.

(20) Kern.

(21) Redwood City.

(22) Ventura.

(23) San Marcos.

(24) The California Maritime Academy, a specialized institution.

(25) Monterey County.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1995.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1298, Sec. 3.5) by Stats. 1994, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 27, 1994.   Section operative July 1, 1995, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

89002.

The campuses authorized in paragraphs (19), (21), and (22) of subdivision (a) of Section 89001 shall commence construction only upon resolution of the trustees, approved by the California Postsecondary Education Commission.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1995.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 901, Sec. 5) by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 245.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

89005.

All references in law or regulation to the “California State Colleges,” to the “California State University and Colleges,” or to “state colleges” shall be deemed to refer to the California State University and to the system of institutions of higher education that comprises the California State University as authorized in Section 89001. The term “campus” shall mean any of the institutions included within the California State University specified in Section 89001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 134.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

89005.5.

(a) (1) All of the following names are the property of the state:

(A) “California State University.”

(B) The names of all educational institutions in the state with names containing the words “California State University.”

(C) All of the following names:

(i) “California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo.”

(ii) “California State Polytechnic University, Humboldt.”

(iii) “California State Polytechnic University, Pomona.”

(iv) “California Maritime Academy.”

(v) “Humboldt State University.”

(vi) “Sonoma State University.”

(vii) “San Francisco State University.”

(viii) “San Jose State University.”

(ix) “San Diego State University.”

(D) Abbreviations of names listed in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(i) “Cal State.”

(ii) “Cal Maritime.”

(iii) “Humboldt State.”

(iv) “Sonoma State.”

(v) “San Francisco State.”

(vi) “San Jose State.”

(vii) “San Diego State.”

(viii) “Cal Poly.”

(ix) “CSU.”

(2) No person shall, without the permission of the Trustees of the California State University, use this name, or any abbreviation of it or any name of which these words are a part, in any of the following ways:

(A) To designate any business, social,
 political, religious, or other organization, including, but not limited to, any corporation, firm, partnership, association, group, activity, or enterprise.

(B) To imply, indicate, or otherwise suggest that any product, service, or organization is connected or affiliated with, or is endorsed, favored, or supported by, or is opposed by the Trustees of the California State University or any educational institution administered by the trustees. The permission of the trustees is required before any name listed in this subdivision may be used for any commercial purpose.

(C) To display, advertise, or announce this name publicly at, or in connection with, any meeting, assembly, or demonstration, or any propaganda, advertising, or promotional activity of any kind which has for its purpose or any part of its purpose the support, endorsement, advancement, opposition, or defeat of any
 strike, lockout, or boycott or of any political, religious, sociological, or economic movement, activity, or program.

(b) However, nothing in this section shall interfere with any person who makes, or restrict the right of any person to make, a true and accurate statement of their present or former relationship or connection with, their employment by, or their enrollment in, the California State University in the course of stating their experience or qualifications for any academic, governmental, business, or professional credit or enrollment, or in connection with any academic, governmental, professional, or other employment whatsoever.

(c) Every person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 465, Sec. 12.   (AB 2973)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

89005.7.

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) (1) Each campus of the California State University shall observe November 11, known as Veterans Day, as a holiday, and shall be closed on that day.

(2) When November 11 falls on a Sunday, each campus of the California State University shall observe the following Monday as the Veterans Day holiday. When November 11 falls on a Saturday, each campus of the California State University shall observe the preceding Friday as the Veterans Day holiday.

(b) (1) Each campus of
 the California State University may observe the date corresponding with the second new moon following the winter solstice, or the third new moon following the winter solstice should an intercalary month intervene, known as “Lunar New Year,” as a holiday, and be closed on that day. The campus may replace observing another prescribed holiday
 with observing Lunar New Year as a holiday. If the campus observes the Lunar New Year holiday and Lunar New Year falls on another prescribed holiday that is not being replaced by the Lunar New Year holiday, the campus shall observe the preceding or following weekday as the Lunar New Year holiday.

(2) If a campus of the California State University observes the Lunar New Year holiday pursuant to paragraph (1), employees of the campus shall be entitled to a paid holiday on that
 day if they are in a paid status during any portion of the working day immediately preceding or succeeding the Lunar New Year holiday.

(3) If this subdivision conflicts with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if those provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget
 Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   (AB 2883)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

89006.

It is unlawful for any person to utilize any information, not a matter of public record, that is received by that person by reason of his or her employment by, or contractual relationship with, the trustees, the California State University, or an auxiliary organization of the California State University, for personal pecuniary gain, not contemplated by the terms of the employment or contract, regardless of whether the person is or is not so employed or under contract at the time the gain is realized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 36.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

89007.

For the purposes of Section 11032 of the Government Code, the following constitute, among other proper purposes of like or different character, state business for officers and employees of the trustees for which the officers and employees shall be allowed actual and necessary traveling expenses:

(a) Attending meetings of any association, organization or agency having as its principal purpose the study of matters relating to education or to a particular field or fields of education, or any agency of such association.

(b) Conferring with officers or employees of this state or the United States, or appearing before committees of either house of the Congress of the United States, relative to problems relating to education in California.

(c) Conferring with officers or employees of other states engaged in the performance of similar duties.

(d) Obtaining information useful to the trustees in the conduct of their work. 

The provisions of Section 11032 of the Government Code, requiring approval by the Governor and Director of Finance of traveling and expenses outside the state shall not be applicable to the officers and employees of the trustees.

If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89008.

The trustees shall prescribe rules and regulations governing the use of state-owned or leased motor vehicles by employees of the California State University. The rules shall include the remedies of assessing actual costs of misuse of state-owned or leased motor vehicles, and employee discipline under Section 89535.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89009.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the land and improvements comprising the Camarillo State Hospital be transferred to the trustees to be developed and improved as a campus of the California State University in order to make public postsecondary education more available to qualified persons in the Ventura County area as well as throughout the state.

(b) Upon approval by the trustees, the Department of General Services shall transfer the land and improvements comprising the Camarillo State Hospital to the trustees. The Department of General Services shall be reimbursed for its administrative costs incurred in connection with the transfer, and an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) is hereby
 appropriated from the General Fund to the department for that purpose.

(c) In order to raise revenues to assist in building a campus of the California State University and to provide a source of funding for the program thereof, the trustees may sell and lease interests in real property included within the land comprising Camarillo State Hospital that are not needed for campus purposes. The proceeds from any sale or lease pursuant to this section shall be deposited in local trust accounts and are available for expenditure for the improvement of real property of the campus and funding the programs of the campus. Funds so deposited and maintained may be invested in accordance with state law and are continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year for the purpose of building, maintaining, and funding a campus of the California State University in Ventura County at the site of the Camarillo State Hospital.

(d) This section shall be liberally construed to accomplish the intent of the Legislature.

(e) This section does not apply to the approximately 57-acre noncontiguous parcel of the Camarillo State Hospital property located on Lewis Road in Ventura County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 386, Sec. 17.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

89010.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of, Article 2 (commencing with Section 14660) of Chapter 2 of Part 5.5 of, and Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of, Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law to the contrary, the trustees may sell improvements located on the land at the California State University, Monterey Bay campus that was transferred to the trustees from the United States of America and used for housing purposes, in circumstances in which the underlying ownership in the land remains with the trustees. The trustees may exercise this authority without the prior approval of any other state department or agency.

(b) Moneys received by the trustees from the sale of improvements authorized in this section shall be deposited in local trust accounts. Moneys so deposited may be invested in accordance with state law and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for the purposes of building, maintaining, and funding a campus of the California State University at Monterey Bay through expenditures for improvements to the campus, funding of scholarships, and other academic purposes of the campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

89011.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that public programs of postsecondary education be made available to qualified persons throughout this state, including areas of substantial existing or projected population that are isolated from any campus of the California State University.

(b) The Trustees of the California State University shall consider the establishment of a permanent, state-supported off-campus center on state-owned property in Contra Costa County, the purpose of which shall be to continue to offer education programs at the upper division and graduate levels.

(c) Pursuant to the establishment of a permanent, state-supported off-campus center as provided by subdivision (b), the trustees shall contract for the preparation of a master plan for physical development, and a detailed survey of Contra Costa County, as follows:

(1) The master plan for the physical development of the center shall project major land uses, including open space, and the development of physical facilities, including those relating to lecture and laboratory use, and other instructional activities, site work, plant operations, and adjunct operations. The master plan shall be subject to the approval of the Trustees of the California State University.

(2) The detailed survey of Contra Costa County shall include, but not be limited to, official population projections, an industry and income profile, an analysis of specific education program requirements of potentially qualified students, an assessment of the need for educational services at the upper division and graduate levels, and an assessment of the services currently provided by other public and private institutions of postsecondary education, including the University of California and the California Community Colleges.

(d) The trustees shall review the results of the master plan and survey and shall forward the results to the California Postsecondary Education Commission for its review pursuant to Section 66904.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 38.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers of the Trustees [89030. - 89049.1.]

89030.

(a) The trustees shall adopt rules and regulations not inconsistent with the laws of this state for the government of all of the following:

(1) The trustees.

(2) The appointees and employees of the trustees.

(3) The California State University.

(b) The adoption of these rules and regulations shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) The rules and regulations shall be published for distribution as soon as practicable after adoption.

(d) This section shall be liberally construed in order that the purposes of the Donahoe Higher Education Act pursuant to Part 40 (commencing with Section 66010) of Division 5 may be effectuated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 938, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

89030.1.

(a) (1) The trustees shall adopt, amend, or repeal regulations pursuant to this section instead of pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. As used in this section, “regulation” means every rule, regulation, order, or standard of general application or the amendment, supplement, or revision of any rule, regulation, order, or standard adopted by the university to implement, interpret, or make specific the law enforced or administered by it, or to govern its procedure, except one that relates only to the internal management of the university. “Regulation” does not mean or include any form prescribed by the university or any instructions relating to the use
 of the form, nor does it mean or include a building standard as defined in Section 18909 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The trustees’ office of general counsel shall review the proposed regulations for matters such as necessity, authority, clarity, consistency, reference, and nonduplication, and recommend any proposed action to the trustees. For purposes of this section, “necessity,” “authority,” “clarity,” “consistency,” “reference,” and “nonduplication” shall have the same meaning as defined by Section 11349 of the Government Code.

(b) At least 45 days before the public hearing, and before adoption of a proposed regulation, written notice of the proposed regulation shall be made available on the Internet Web site of the trustees. Written notice shall also be sent to those persons who have requested notices of the meetings of the trustees. The notice shall include the right of the public to comment orally or in writing on the proposed action either before or during the public hearing.

(c) At the hearing, the public shall be provided the opportunity to comment on the proposed action.

(d) The trustees shall maintain a rulemaking file containing the public notice, public comments, and minutes of the public hearing, including the action taken by the trustees.

(1) The rulemaking file shall contain a summary of each objection or recommendation made, with an explanation of how the proposed action was changed to accommodate each objection or recommendation, or the reason or reasons for making no change.

(2) The proposed regulations shall be accompanied by an estimate, prepared in accordance with instructions adopted by the Department of Finance, of the effect of the proposed regulations with
 regard to the costs or savings to any state agency, the cost of any state-mandated local program as governed by Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any other costs or savings of local agencies, and the costs or savings in federal funding provided to state
 agencies.

(e) The trustees shall transmit the regulations as finally adopted to the Secretary of State for filing. Each regulation shall be effective upon filing with the Secretary of State, and shall be published in the California Code of Regulations.

(f) On or before January 15 of each year, the trustees shall report to the Governor, the Senate Education Committee, and the Assembly Higher Education Committee as to all regulatory actions taken by the trustees during the previous calendar year. The report shall include the statement of reasons for each regulatory action taken, indicate whether any concerns were raised regarding the proposed action, and the steps taken by the trustees to alleviate those concerns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 712, Sec. 1.   (AB 819)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

89030.5.

(a) In order to provide notice to the public and ensure the transparency of decisions affecting admissions criteria for all of the campuses of the California State University, the trustees shall ensure that a change in the criteria for admission to a campus of the university complies with all of the following requirements:

(1) Before adopting a change in the criteria for admission that affects applicants residing within the local service area of a campus of the university, the campus affected by the proposed change shall do all of the following:

(A) Consult with stakeholders, including the governing boards of school districts, governing boards of community college districts, and community
 organizations, that are located within the local service area of the affected campus. These consultations shall occur in a public meeting.

(B) Hold three public hearings in the local service area of the affected campus. The hearings shall solicit public comments relative to the proposed change in admissions criteria.

(C) Provide public notice of the proposed change in admissions criteria. The notice shall be published on the internet website for the affected campus and in three newspapers of general circulation in the local service area of the affected campus. The notice shall include a description of the proposed change, the right of the public to comment orally or in writing on the proposed change, and the dates, times, and locations of the public meetings pursuant to subparagraph (A) and the public hearings pursuant to subparagraph (B). The notice shall be published at least 10
 days before the first public meeting or public hearing.

(D) Publish on the internet website of the affected campus, all public comments received pursuant to this paragraph and all responses by the university to those public comments.

(E) Publish on the internet website of the affected campus, and distribute to community officials and local high schools, the university’s final decision on the proposed change.

(2) After meeting all of the requirements specified in paragraph (1), the president of the affected campus shall submit the proposed change to the Chancellor of the California State University for approval, in accordance with the policies of the trustees. The chancellor shall report the decision regarding approval, and the reasoning behind the decision, to the trustees in writing at the next regularly scheduled
 meeting of the trustees.

(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4), a change in the criteria for admission to a campus that affects applicants within the local service area of the affected campus shall become effective only after a period of at least one year has elapsed after that change is approved by the chancellor.

(4) A change in the criteria for admission to a campus based on resources that affects applicants within the local service area of the affected campus shall become effective only after a period of at least six months has elapsed after that change is approved by the chancellor.

(b) The requirements set forth in subdivision (a) shall apply to all changes in the criteria for admission to a campus that affect the eligibility of applicants residing within the local service area of a campus to enroll at that
 campus, including changes to transfer requirements and determinations regarding establishing or modifying admission criteria for impacted majors.

(c) As used in this section, “local service area” means the California State University service area for the campus as set forth in the California State University Coded Memorandum AA-2005-05, dated February 23, 2005, or as subsequently amended.

(d) Notwithstanding the requirements of subdivision (a), a decision to discontinue additional admission criteria for an impacted program or campus may be implemented, provided that the decision is published on the campus internet website, distributed to community officials and local high schools, and submitted to the Chancellor of the California State University for approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 465, Sec. 13.   (AB 2973)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

89030.7.

With respect to denial of admission for an applicant, the Trustees of the California State University shall ensure for each campus of the California State University all of the following:

(a) Appeal procedures that clearly set forth the following:

(1) The basis for appeal.

(2) A timeframe of 15 business days from the date of denial of admissions notification in which to appeal.

(3) A limit of one appeal per academic term.

(4) The contact information for the campus
 office to which an appeal is submitted.

(5) A time estimate for when the campus expects to issue a response to an appeal request.

(b) The campus includes the appeal procedures described in subdivision (a) in a denial of admission notification to a student.

(c) The campus posts information on the campus Internet Web site that details the appeal procedures described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 163, Sec. 1.   (AB 670)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

89031.

The trustees may establish rules and regulations for the government and maintenance of the buildings and grounds of the California State University. Every person who violates or attempts to violate the rules and regulations is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

89031.5.

The trustees shall perform inspections of all motor vehicles owned by the California State University or under their jurisdiction. These inspections shall be provided for in the appropriate administrative manual of the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 843, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89032.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that students of the California State University acquire the knowledge and skills that will help them comprehend the diversity and social justice history of the United States and of the society in which they live to enable them to contribute to that society as responsible and constructive citizens.

(b) Commencing with the 2021–22 academic year, the California State University shall provide for courses in ethnic studies at each of its campuses.

(c) The California State University shall collaborate with the California State University Council on Ethnic Studies and the Academic Senate of the California State University to develop core competencies to be achieved by students who complete an ethnic studies course pursuant to implementation of this section. The council and the academic senate shall approve the core competencies before commencement of the 2021–22 academic year.

(d) Commencing with
 students graduating in the 2024–25
 academic year, the California State University shall require, as an undergraduate graduation requirement, the completion of, at minimum, one three-unit course in ethnic studies. The university shall not increase the number of units required to graduate from the university with a baccalaureate degree by the enforcement of this requirement. This graduation requirement shall not apply to a postbaccalaureate student who is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program at the university if the student has satisfied either of the following:

(1) The student has earned a baccalaureate degree from an institution accredited by a regional accrediting agency.

(2) The student has completed an ethnic studies course at a postsecondary educational institution accredited by a regional accrediting
 agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 32, Sec. 2.   (AB 1460)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

89033.

(a) The chancellor, when reviewing and updating any executive orders relating to discrimination, harassment, and retaliation for the purpose of enforcing or implementing the requirements of Section 67385, may do so in collaboration, as the chancellor deems appropriate, with any of the following:

(1) The Systemwide Title IX Office.

(2) The Executive Vice Chancellor of Academic and Student Affairs, the Associate Vice Chancellor for Student Affairs and Enrollment Management, the vice presidents for student affairs, and other executive vice chancellors and vice chancellors.

(3) The Office of General Counsel.

(4) The Vice Chancellor of Human Resources and other human resources and academic personnel officers.

(5) Campus Title IX coordinators.

(6) Presidents and provosts of the various campuses of the university.

(7) Sexual assault counselors, confidential sexual assault victims advocates, and domestic violence counselors.

(8) Representatives of the student bodies at each campus of the university.

(9) The Vice Chancellor of Administration and Finance.

(b) The chancellor shall submit the text of all executive orders to which this section applies in an annual report to the respective chairs of the Assembly Committee on Higher Education and the Senate Committee on Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 556, Sec. 2.   (AB 1467)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

89034.

The authority to select and change the name of any institution of higher education in the California State University shall be vested in the trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 8, Sec. 41.   Effective April 15, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

89035.

Wherever in this code a power is vested in the trustees, the trustees by majority vote may adopt a rule delegating such power to any officer, employee, or committee as the trustees may designate. The rule shall prescribe the limits of such delegation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89036.
